Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 3. Funded Settlements

§ 201.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Disbursement of loan funds” means the delivery of the loan funds by the lender to the settlement agent in one or more of the following forms:

cash;

wired funds or electronic transfer;

certified check;

checks issued by a governmental entity or instrumentality;

cashier’s check, teller’s check, or any transfer of funds by check or otherwise that is fully collected and unconditionally available to the settlement agent;

checks or other drafts issued by a state-chartered or federally chartered financial institution; checks or other drafts issued by a state-chartered or federally chartered credit union; and

checks issued by an insurance company licensed in the State of Vermont.

“Disbursement of the settlement proceeds” means the payment of all proceeds of the transaction by the settlement agent to the persons or accounts designated to receive the proceeds.

“Lender” means any person who is in the business of making loans secured by a mortgage on real estate and to whom the debt is initially payable on the face of the loan documents.

“Loan closing” means the time a borrower executes any loan document or becomes contractually obligated on a credit transaction, whichever occurs sooner.

“Loan documents” means the note evidencing the debt due the lender, the mortgage securing the debt due the lender, and any other documents required by the lender to be executed by the borrower as part of the transaction.

“Loan funds” means the proceeds of the loan to be disbursed by the lender to others at closing.

“Settlement” means the time when the settlement agent has received the loan funds, loan documents, and other documents and funds to carry out the terms of the contract between the parties, and the settlement agent reasonably determines that all conditions of such contracts have been satisfied. “Parties,” as used in this subdivision, means the seller, purchaser, borrower, lender, and settlement agent.

“Settlement agent” means the person responsible for conducting the settlement and disbursement of the settlement proceeds, and includes an individual, corporation, partnership, or other entity conducting the settlement and disbursement of the settlement proceeds. The lender may be the settlement agent.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 55

, § 2.

§ 202.
Applicability.

This subchapter applies only to transactions involving loans made by lenders, which loans are secured by a first lien on owner-occupied one-to-four-unit residential real estate, including first and second homes.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 55

, § 2.

§ 203.
Duty of lender.

The lender shall, at or before the loan closing, cause disbursement of loan funds to the settlement agent; however, in the case of a refinancing, or any other loan where a right of rescission applies but has not been exercised, the lender shall, prior to 2:00 p.m. Eastern Standard Time of the first business day after the expiration of the rescission period required under the federal Truth-in-Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.), cause disbursement of loan funds to the settlement agent.

If the lender is acting as settlement agent, the lender shall cause disbursement of the settlement proceeds at the loan closing, or, for any other loan where a right of rescission applies, the lender shall cause disbursement of the settlement proceeds on the first business day after the expiration of the rescission period.

The lender shall not be entitled to receive or charge any interest on the loan until disbursement of the settlement proceeds.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 55

, § 2.

§ 204.
Duty of settlement agent that is not a lender.

A settlement agent that has received the loan funds from the lender shall cause disbursement of settlement proceeds at the loan closing, or, for any other loan where a right of rescission applies, the settlement agent shall cause disbursement of the settlement proceeds on the first business day after the expiration of the rescission period.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 55

, § 2.

§ 205.
Commissioner’s powers.

The Commissioner may:

impose an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation upon any person who violates or participates in the violation of this subchapter, or any lawful regulation or order issued thereunder;

order any person to make restitution to any person injured as a result of a violation of this subchapter; and

order any person to cease and desist in any specified conduct.

The powers vested in the Commissioner by this subchapter shall be in addition to any other powers to enforce any penalties, fines, or forfeitures authorized by law.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 55

, § 2.

§ 206.
Consumer remedies.

A lender or settlement agent who violates any provision of this subchapter and causes actual damage to a consumer is subject to a civil action by the aggrieved consumer in which the consumer has the right to recover the greater of actual damages in an amount determined by the court or, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an amount determined by the court of not less than $250.00 nor more than $1,000.00, plus costs of the action, together with reasonable attorney’s fees.

Liability under subsection (a) of this section is limited to actual damages, plus costs of the action, together with reasonable attorney’s fees, if the lender or settlement agent shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any such error.

An action may not be brought pursuant to this section more than two years after the loan closing has occurred.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 55

, § 2.